Texas, session 891, HB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 411.306, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.306.  CONTENT OF POWER OUTAGE ALERT. The power outage alert must be in English and Spanish and include a statement that electricity customers may experience a power outage. SECTION 2.  Section 411.352, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.352.  STATEWIDE AMERICA'S MISSING: BROADCAST EMERGENCY RESPONSE (AMBER) ALERT SYSTEM FOR ABDUCTED CHILDREN AND MISSING PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES. With the cooperation of the Texas Department of Transportation, the office of the governor, and other appropriate law enforcement agencies in this state, the department shall develop and implement a statewide alert system to be activated on behalf of an abducted child or a missing person with an intellectual disability. The department shall require that the information provided through the alert system, including information sent through text messages, be in English and Spanish. SECTION 3.  Section 411.372, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.372.  DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF ALERT SYSTEM. With the cooperation of the Texas Department of Transportation, the office of the governor, and other appropriate law enforcement agencies in this state, the department shall develop and implement an alert system to be activated on report of an active shooter. The department shall require that the information provided through the alert system, including information sent through text messages, be in English and Spanish. SECTION 4.  Section 411.388, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.388.  CONTENT OF SILVER ALERT. The alert must be in English and Spanish and include: (1)  all appropriate information that is provided by the local law enforcement agency and that may lead to the safe recovery of the missing senior citizen or person with Alzheimer's disease; and (2)  a statement instructing any person with information related to the missing senior citizen or person with Alzheimer's disease to contact a local law enforcement agency. SECTION 5.  Section 411.448, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.448.  CONTENT OF ALERT. The alert must be in English and Spanish and include: (1)  all appropriate information that is provided by the law enforcement agency under Section 411.446 and that may lead to the apprehension of the missing suspect; and (2)  a statement instructing any person with information related to the missing suspect to contact a law enforcement agency. SECTION 6.  Section 411.468, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 411.468.  CONTENT OF ALERT. The alert must be in English and Spanish and include: (1)  all appropriate information that may lead to the safe recovery of the missing adult, as determined by the department; and (2)  a statement instructing any person with information related to the missing adult to contact a local or state law enforcement agency. SECTION 7.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas shall adopt rules to implement the changes in law made by this Act. SECTION 8.  This Act takes effect September 1, 2025.